Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.065

Adjustment of state appropriations for student financial aid.

It is the intent of the legislature that students who demonstrate financial need not be deprived of access to higher education due to increases in educational costs or consequent increases in tuition and fees. It is the sense of the legislature that state appropriations for student financial aid be adjusted in an amount which together with funds estimated to be available in the form of basic educational opportunity grants as authorized under Section 411 of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 as now or hereafter amended will equal twenty-four percent of any change in revenue estimated to occur as a result of revisions in tuition and fee levels under the provisions of chapter 322, Laws of 1977 ex. sess.

[ 2019 c 406 s 29; 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 322: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 17.]